Maryland, session 2025, SB0434.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 7–701(n) of Article – Public Utilities of the Annotated Code of Maryland be
repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 7–701(c) through
(e–1), (f) through (g–1), (h), (h–1), (i), (i–1), (j) through (m), (o) through (p–1), and (q) through
(t) of Article – Public Utilities of the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be
Section(s) 7–701(e) through (z), respectively.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
5–102.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(9) Forests are a renewable resource that help the State meet its renewable
energy goals that are consistent with the State’s:
(i) Green power goal for State facilities;
(ii) [Renewable] CLEAN Energy Portfolio Standard;
(iii) Healthy Air Act; and
(iv) Maryland Clean Energy Incentive Act of 2006; and
Article – Public Utilities
7–306.2.
(b) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) community solar energy generating systems:
(i) provide residents and businesses, including those that lease
property, increased access to local solar electricity while encouraging private investment in
solar resources;

SENATE BILL 434
(ii) enhance continued diversification of the State’s energy resource
mix to achieve the State’s [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard and Greenhouse
Gas Emissions Reduction Act goals; and
(iii) provide electric companies and ratepayers the opportunity to
realize the many benefits associated with distributed energy; and
7–510.3.
(k) (1) Except for the purposes of meeting the requirements of the [renewable]
CLEAN energy portfolio standard under Subtitle 7 of this title, a community choice
aggregator may not be considered to be an electricity supplier under § 7–507(a) of this
subtitle.
7–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(C) “CLEAN ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD” OR “STANDARD” MEANS THE
PERCENTAGE OF ELECTRICITY SALES AT RETAIL IN THE STATE THAT IS TO BE
DERIVED FROM CLEAN ENERGY SOURCES IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 7–703(B) OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(D) “CLEAN ENERGY SOURCE” MEANS:
(1) A TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCE;
(2) A TIER 2 RENEWABLE SOURCE; OR
(3) A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATING STATION, INCLUDING A SMALL
MODULAR REACTOR, CONNECTED WITH THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION GRID
SERVING THE STATE.
(q) “Qualified offshore wind project” means a wind turbine electricity generation
facility, including the associated transmission–related interconnection facilities and
equipment, that:
(1) is located:
(i) on the outer continental shelf of the Atlantic Ocean in an area
that the United States Department of the Interior designates for leasing; and
(ii) more than 10 miles off the coast of the State for a project selected
under § 7–704.4 of this subtitle or approved under § 7–704.1 of this subtitle after June 1,
2023; and

SENATE BILL 434 5
(2) interconnects to the TRANSMISSION SYSTEM THROUGH:
(I) THE PJM Interconnection [grid:
(i) at a point located on the Delmarva Peninsula]; or
(ii) an offshore wind transmission project selected under § 7–704.3
of this subtitle.
7–702.
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly to:
(1) recognize the economic, environmental, fuel diversity, and security
benefits of [renewable] CLEAN energy resources;
(2) reduce greenhouse gas emissions and eliminate carbon–fueled
generation from the State’s electric grid by using these resources;
(3) establish a market for electricity from these resources in Maryland; and
(4) lower the cost to consumers of electricity produced from these resources.
(b) The General Assembly finds AND DECLARES that:
(1) THE STATE HAS A GOAL OF ACHIEVING 100% CLEAN ELECTRICITY;
(2) AS OF JANUARY 1, 2025, THE RENEWABLE ENERGY PORTFOLIO
STANDARD AND OFFSHORE WIND ENERGY LEASES WILL NOT SATISFY THE GOAL
STATED IN ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
(3) TO ACHIEVE ITS CLEAN ELECTRICITY GOAL, THE STATE MUST
FACILITATE THE CONSTRUCTION OF AT LEAST 3,000 MEGAWATTS OF ELECTRICITY
FROM CLEAN ENERGY GENERATION PROJECTS TO:
(I) REDUCE THE ADVERSE CLIMATE AND HEALTH IMPACTS OF
TRADITIONAL FOSSIL FUEL ENERGY SOURCES;
(II) PROMOTE THE DEVELOPMENT OF CLEAN ENERGY SOURCES
THAT INCREASE THE NATION’S INDEPENDENCE FROM FOREIGN SOURCES OF FOSSIL
FUELS;

SENATE BILL 434
(III) POSITION THE STATE TO TAKE ADVANTAGE OF THE
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT BENEFITS OF THE EMERGING SMALL MODULAR REACTOR
INDUSTRY; AND
(IV) PROVIDE A LONG–TERM HEDGE AGAINST VOLATILE PRICES
OF FOSSIL FUELS;
[(1)] (4) the benefits of electricity from [renewable] CLEAN energy
resources, including long–term decreased emissions, a healthier environment, increased
energy security, and decreased reliance on and vulnerability from imported energy sources,
accrue to the public at large;
[(2)] (5) electricity suppliers and consumers share an obligation to
develop a minimum level of these resources in the electricity supply portfolio of the State;
and
[(3)] (6) the State needs to increase its reliance on [renewable] CLEAN
energy in order to:
(i) reduce greenhouse gas emissions and meet the State’s
greenhouse gas emissions reduction goals under § 2–1205 of the Environment Article; and
(ii) provide opportunities for small, minority, women–owned, and
veteran–owned businesses to participate in and develop a highly skilled workforce for clean
energy industries in the State.
7–703.
(a) (1) (i) The Commission shall implement a [renewable] CLEAN energy
portfolio standard that, except as provided under paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection,
applies to all retail electricity sales in the State by electricity suppliers.
(ii) If the standard becomes applicable to electricity sold to a
customer after the start of a calendar year, the standard does not apply to electricity sold
to the customer during that portion of the year before the standard became applicable.
(2) A [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard may not apply to
electricity sales at retail by any electricity supplier:
(i) in excess of 300,000,000 kilowatt–hours of industrial process load
to a single customer in a year;
(ii) to residential customers in a region of the State in which
electricity prices for residential customers are subject to a freeze or cap contained in a
settlement agreement entered into under § 7–505 of this title until the freeze or cap has
expired; or

SENATE BILL 434 7
(iii) to a customer served by an electric cooperative under an
electricity supplier purchase agreement that existed on October 1, 2004, until the
expiration of the agreement, as the agreement may be renewed or amended.
(3) The portion of a [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard that
represents offshore wind:
(i) applies only to the distribution sales of electric companies; and
(ii) may not apply to distribution sales by any electric company in
excess of:
1. 75,000,000 kilowatt–hours of industrial process load to a
single customer in a year; and
2. 3,000 kilowatt–hours of electricity in a month to a
customer who is an owner of agricultural land and files an Internal Revenue Service form
1040, schedule F.
(b) Except as provided in subsections (e) and (f) of this section, the [renewable]
CLEAN energy portfolio standard shall be as follows:
(20) 60.5% in 2025, INCLUDING AT LEAST:
(i) 35.5% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 7% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle, not to exceed 10%, derived from offshore wind energy; and
3. at least 0.25% derived from post–2022 geothermal
systems;
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources;
(21) 63% in 2026, INCLUDING AT LEAST:
(i) 38% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 8% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 400 megawatts of Round
2 offshore wind projects; and

SENATE BILL 434
3. at least 0.5% derived from post–2022 geothermal systems;
and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources; and
(22) 66.5% in 2027, INCLUDING AT LEAST:
(i) 41.5% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 9.5% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 400 megawatts of Round
2 offshore wind projects; and
3. at least 0.75% derived from post–2022 geothermal
systems; and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources; and
(23) 68% in 2028, INCLUDING AT LEAST:
(i) 43% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 11% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 800 megawatts of Round
2 offshore wind projects; and
3. at least 1% derived from post–2022 geothermal systems;
and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources; and
(24) 74.5% in 2029, INCLUDING AT LEAST:
(i) 49.5% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 12.5% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 800 megawatts of Round
2 offshore wind projects; and
3. at least 1% derived from post–2022 geothermal systems;
and

SENATE BILL 434 9
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources; and
(25) 75% in 2030 and later, INCLUDING AT LEAST:
(i) 50% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
1. at least 14.5% derived from solar energy;
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle derived from offshore wind energy, including at least 1,200 megawatts of
Round 2 offshore wind projects; and
3. at least 1% derived from post–2022 geothermal systems;
and
(ii) 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources.
(c) Before calculating the number of credits required to meet the percentages
established under subsection (b) of this section, an electricity supplier shall exclude from
its total retail electricity sales all retail electricity sales described in subsection (a)(2) and
(3) of this section.
(d) (1) Subject to subsections (a) and (c) of this section, an electricity supplier
shall meet the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard for all Tier 1 and Tier 2
renewable sources except offshore wind by accumulating the equivalent amount of
renewable energy credits that equal the percentages required under this section.
(2) An electric company shall meet the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio
standard for offshore wind in accordance with § 7–704.2 of this subtitle.
(e) (1) The required percentage of an electric cooperative’s [renewable] CLEAN
energy portfolio standard derived from solar energy shall be 2.5% in 2020 and later.
(2) The required percentage of a municipal electric utility’s [renewable]
CLEAN energy portfolio standard shall be:
(i) in 2021:
1. 20.4% from Tier 1 renewable sources, including:
A. at least 1.95% derived from solar energy; and
B. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle, not to exceed 2.5%, derived from offshore wind energy; and

SENATE BILL 434
2. 2.5% from Tier 2 renewable sources; and
(ii) in 2022 and later, 20.4% from Tier 1 renewable sources,
including:
1. at least 1.95% derived from solar energy; and
2. an amount set by the Commission under § 7–704.2(a) of
this subtitle, not to exceed 2.5%, derived from offshore wind energy.
(f) (1) (i) In this subsection the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(ii) “Area median income” has the meaning stated in § 4–1801 of the
Housing and Community Development Article.
(iii) “Low or moderate income housing” means housing that is
affordable for a household with an aggregate annual income that is below 120% of the area
median income.
(2) At least 25% of the required percentage of the [renewable] CLEAN
energy portfolio STANDARD for each year as set forth in subsection (b) of this section
derived from post–2022 geothermal systems shall be derived from systems that were
installed:
(i) at single or multifamily housing units that qualified as low or
moderate income housing on the date the system was installed on the property; or
(ii) at institutions that primarily serve low and moderate income
individuals and families, including:
1. schools with a majority of students who are eligible for free
and reduced price meals;
2. hospitals with a majority of patients eligible for financial
assistance or who are enrolled in Medicaid; and
3. other institutions that serve individuals and families
where the majority of those served are eligible based on income for federal or State safety
net programs.
(G) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, STARTING IN
2025, THE COMMISSION SHALL REDUCE THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION EACH YEAR BY A PERCENTAGE EQUAL TO THE GENERATION OUTPUT
OF NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATING STATIONS CONNECTED TO THE ELECTRIC

SENATE BILL 434 11
DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM IN THE STATE IN THE PREVIOUS YEAR DIVIDED BY THE
ELECTRICITY RETAIL SALES IN THE SAME YEAR.
(2) THE PERCENTAGE REQUIREMENT REDUCED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT INCLUDE THE PERCENTAGE REQUIRED FROM
TIER 1 RENEWABLE SOURCES OR TIER 2 RENEWABLE SOURCES.
7–704.
(a) (1) Energy from a Tier 1 renewable source:
(i) is eligible for inclusion in meeting the [renewable] CLEAN
energy portfolio standard regardless of when the generating system or facility was placed
in service; and
(ii) may be applied to the percentage requirements of the standard
for either Tier 1 renewable sources or Tier 2 renewable sources.
(2) (i) Energy from a Tier 1 renewable source under [§ 7–701(s)(1), (5),
(9), (10), or (11)] § 7–701(Y)(1), (5), (9), (10), OR (11) of this subtitle is eligible for
inclusion in meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard only if the source is
connected with the electric distribution [grid] SYSTEM serving Maryland.
(ii) Energy from a Tier 1 renewable source under [§ 7–701(s)(13)] §
7–701(Y)(13) of this subtitle is eligible for inclusion in meeting the [renewable] CLEAN
energy portfolio standard only if the source:
1. is connected with the electric distribution [grid] SYSTEM
serving Maryland; or
2. processes wastewater from Maryland residents.
(iii) If the owner of a solar generating system in this State chooses to
sell solar renewable energy credits from that system, the owner must first offer the credits
for sale to an electricity supplier or electric company that shall apply them toward
compliance with the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard under § 7–703 of this
subtitle.
(3) Energy from a Tier 1 renewable source under [§ 7–701(s)(8)] §
7–701(Y)(8) of this subtitle is eligible for inclusion in meeting the [renewable] CLEAN
energy portfolio standard if it is generated at a dam that existed as of January 1, 2004,
even if a system or facility that is capable of generating electricity did not exist on that
date.

SENATE BILL 434
(4) Energy from a Tier 2 renewable source under [§ 7–701(t)] §
7–701(Z) of this subtitle is eligible for inclusion in meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy
portfolio standard if it is generated at a system or facility that existed and was operational
as of January 1, 2004, even if the facility or system was not capable of generating electricity
on that date.
(b) On or after January 1, 2004, an electricity supplier may:
(1) receive renewable energy credits; and
(2) accumulate renewable energy credits under this subtitle.
(c) (1) This subsection applies only to a generating facility that is placed in
service on or after January 1, 2004.
(2) (i) On or before December 31, 2005, an electricity supplier shall
receive 120% credit toward meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard for
energy derived from wind.
(ii) After December 31, 2005, and on or before December 31, 2008,
an electricity supplier shall receive 110% credit toward meeting the [renewable] CLEAN
energy portfolio standard for energy derived from wind.
(3) On or before December 31, 2008, an electricity supplier shall receive
110% credit toward meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard for energy
derived from methane under [§ 7–701(r)(4)] § 7–701(Y)(4) of this subtitle.
(d) An electricity supplier shall receive credit toward meeting the [renewable]
CLEAN energy portfolio standard for electricity derived from the biomass fraction of
biomass co–fired with other fuels.
(e) (1) In this subsection, “customer” means:
(i) an industrial electric customer that is not on standard offer
service; or
(ii) a renewable on–site generator.
(2) This subsection does not apply to offshore wind renewable energy
credits.
(3) (i) A customer may independently acquire renewable energy credits
to satisfy the standards applicable to the customer’s load, including credits created by a
renewable on–site generator.

SENATE BILL 434 13
(ii) Credits that a customer transfers to its electricity supplier to
meet the standard and that the electricity supplier relies on in submitting its compliance
report may not be resold or retransferred by the customer or by the electricity supplier.
(4) A renewable on–site generator may retain or transfer at its sole option
any credits created by the renewable on–site generator, including credits for the portion of
its on–site generation from a Tier 1 renewable source or a Tier 2 renewable source that
displaces the purchase of electricity by the renewable on–site generator from the grid.
(5) A customer that satisfies the standard applicable to the customer’s load
under this subsection may not be required to contribute to a compliance fee recovered under
§ 7–706 of this subtitle.
(6) The Commission shall adopt regulations governing the application and
transfer of credits under this subsection consistent with federal law.
(f) (1) In order to create a renewable energy credit, a Tier 1 renewable source
or Tier 2 renewable source must substantially comply with all applicable environmental
and administrative requirements, including air quality, water quality, solid waste, and
right–to–know provisions, permit conditions, and administrative orders.
(2) (i) This paragraph applies to Tier 1 renewable sources that
incinerate solid waste.
(ii) At least 80% of the solid waste incinerated at a Tier 1 renewable
source facility shall be collected from:
1. for areas in Maryland, jurisdictions that achieve the
recycling rates required under § 9–505 of the Environment Article; and
2. for other states, jurisdictions for which the electricity
supplier demonstrates recycling substantially comparable to that required under § 9–505
of the Environment Article, in accordance with regulations of the Commission.
(iii) An electricity supplier may report credits received under this
paragraph based on compliance by the facility with the percentage requirement of
subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph during the year immediately preceding the year in
which the electricity supplier receives the credit to apply to the standard.
(g) (1) Energy from a solar water heating system is eligible for inclusion in
meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard.
(2) A person that owns and operates a solar water heating system shall
receive a renewable energy credit equal to the amount of energy, converted from BTUs to
kilowatt–hours, that is generated by the system that is used by the person for water
heating.

SENATE BILL 434
(3) The total amount of energy generated and consumed for a
nonresidential or commercial solar water heating system shall be measured by an on–site
meter that meets the required performance standards of the International Organization of
Legal Metrology.
(4) The total amount of energy generated and consumed by a residential
solar water heating system shall be:
(i) measured by a meter that meets the required standards of the
International Organization of Legal Metrology; or
(ii) 1. measured by the Solar Ratings and Certification
Corporation’s OG–300 thermal performance rating for the system or an equivalent
certification that the Commission approves in consultation with the Administration; and
2. certified to the OG–300 standard of the Solar Ratings and
Certification Corporation or an equivalent certification body that the Commission approves
in consultation with the Administration.
(5) A residential solar water heating system shall be installed in
accordance with applicable State and local plumbing codes.
(6) A residential solar water heating system may not produce more than
five solar renewable energy credits in any 1 year.
(h) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (6) of this subsection, energy from a
geothermal heating and cooling system, including energy from a legacy geothermal system
and energy from a post–2022 geothermal system, is eligible for inclusion in meeting the
[renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard.
(2) A person shall receive a renewable energy credit equal to the amount of
energy, converted from BTUs to kilowatt–hours, that is generated by a geothermal heating
and cooling system for space heating and cooling or water heating if the person:
(i) owns and operates the system;
(ii) leases and operates the system; or
(iii) contracts with a third party who owns and operates the portion
of the system that consists of:
1. a closed loop or a series of closed loop systems in which
fluid is permanently confined within a pipe or tubing and does not come in contact with the
outside environment; or

SENATE BILL 434 15
2. an open loop system in which ground or surface water is
circulated in an environmentally safe manner directly into the facility and returned to the
same aquifer or surface water source.
(3) To determine the energy savings of a geothermal heating and cooling
system for a residence, the Commission shall:
(i) identify available energy consumption calculators developed by
the geothermal heating and cooling industry;
(ii) collect the following data provided in the renewable energy credit
application that:
1. describes the name of the applicant and the address at
which the geothermal heating and cooling system is installed; and
2. provides the annual BTU energy savings attributable to
home heating, cooling, and water heating; and
(iii) in determining the annual amount of renewable energy credits
awarded for the geothermal heating and cooling system, convert the annual BTUs into
annual megawatt–hours.
(4) To determine the energy savings of a nonresidential geothermal
heating and cooling system, the Commission shall:
(i) use the geothermal heating and cooling engineering technical
system designs provided with the renewable energy credit application; and
(ii) in determining the annual amount of renewable energy credits
awarded for the geothermal heating and cooling system, convert the annual BTUs into
annual megawatt–hours.
(5) A geothermal heating and cooling system shall be installed in
accordance with applicable State well construction and local building code standards.
(6) (i) A post–2022 geothermal system with a 360,000 BTU capacity is
eligible for inclusion in meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard only if
the company installing the system provides for its employees:
1. family–sustaining wages;
2. employer–provided health care with affordable
deductibles and co–pays;
3. career advancement training, as provided in
subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph;

SENATE BILL 434
4. fair scheduling;
5. employer–paid workers’ compensation and unemployment
insurance;
6. a retirement plan;
7. paid time off; and
8. the right to bargain collectively for wages and benefits.
(ii) As part of the career advancement training the installation
company provides, the company shall ensure that a minimum of 10% of the employees
working on the installation are enrolled in an apprenticeship program approved by and
registered with the State or the federal government.
(iii) Compliance with this paragraph shall be regulated and enforced
by the Department of Labor.
(i) (1) Energy from a thermal biomass system is eligible for inclusion in
meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard.
(2) (i) A person that owns and operates a thermal biomass system that
uses anaerobic digestion is eligible to receive a renewable energy credit.
(ii) A person that owns and operates a thermal biomass system that
uses a thermochemical process is eligible to receive a renewable energy credit if the person
demonstrates to the Maryland Department of the Environment that the operation of the
thermal biomass system:
1. is not significantly contributing to local or regional air
quality impairments; and
2. will substantially decrease emissions of oxides of nitrogen
beyond that achieved by a direct burn combustion unit through the use of precombustion
techniques, combustion techniques, or postcombustion techniques.
(3) A person that is eligible to receive a renewable energy credit under
paragraph (2) of this subsection shall receive a renewable energy credit equal to the amount
of energy, converted from BTUs to kilowatt–hours, that is generated by the thermal
biomass system and used on site.
(4) The total amount of energy generated and consumed for a residential,
nonresidential, or commercial thermal biomass system shall be measured by an on–site
meter that meets the required performance standards established by the Commission.

SENATE BILL 434 17
(5) The Commission shall adopt regulations for the metering, verification,
and reporting of the output of thermal biomass systems.
(j) (1) Energy from a wastewater heating or cooling system is eligible for
inclusion in meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard.
(2) A person shall receive a renewable energy credit equal to the amount of
energy, converted from BTUs to kilowatt–hours, that is generated by a wastewater heating
or cooling system for space heating or cooling, industrial heating or cooling, or another
useful thermal purpose, if the person:
(i) owns and operates the system;
(ii) leases and operates the system; or
(iii) contracts with a third party who owns and operates the system.
(3) To determine the energy savings of a wastewater heating or cooling
system, the Commission shall:
(i) use the wastewater heating or cooling engineering technical
system designs provided with the renewable energy credit application; and
(ii) in determining the annual amount of renewable energy credits
awarded for the wastewater heating or cooling system, convert the annual BTUs into
annual megawatt–hours.
(4) The Commission shall adopt regulations for the metering, verification,
and reporting of the output of wastewater heating or cooling systems.
7–704.1.
(c) An application shall include:
(6) a commitment to:
(i) abide by the requirements set forth in subsection (f) of this
section; [and]
(ii) deposit at least $6,000,000, in the manner required under
subsection (h) of this section, into the Maryland [Offshore Wind] CLEAN ENERGY
Business Development Fund established under § 9–20C–03 of the State Government
Article;
(III) DEPOSIT INTO AN ESCROW ACCOUNT AN AMOUNT:

SENATE BILL 434
1. DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION TO DISSUADE
WITHDRAWAL FROM THE OREC PROCESS; AND
2. NOT LESS THAN $5,000 PER MEGAWATT OF
NAMEPLATE CAPACITY; AND
(IV) ABIDE BY A WITHDRAWAL PROCESS ESTABLISHED BY THE
COMMISSION, INCLUDING FORFEITURE OF ANY DEPOSIT REQUIRED BY THE
COMMISSION UNDER ITEM (III) OF THIS ITEM;
(e) (1) The Commission shall use the following criteria to evaluate and
compare proposed offshore wind projects submitted during an application period:
(xiii) estimated ability to assist in meeting the [renewable] CLEAN
energy portfolio standard under § 7–703 of this subtitle; and
(f) (1) (iii) The Commission may not approve an applicant’s proposed
offshore wind project unless:
1. for a Round 1 offshore wind project application:
A. OVER THE DURATION OF THE PROPOSED OREC
PRICING SCHEDULE the projected net rate impact for an average residential customer,
based on annual consumption of 12,000 kilowatt–hours[,] AND combined with the projected
net rate impact of other Round 1 offshore wind projects, does not exceed [$1.50 per month
in 2012 dollars, over the duration of the proposed OREC pricing schedule] AN AMOUNT
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION;
B. OVER THE DURATION OF THE PROPOSED OREC
PRICING SCHEDULE the projected net rate impact for all nonresidential customers,
considered as a blended average[,] AND combined with the projected net rate impact of
other Round 1 offshore wind projects, does not exceed [1.5%] A PERCENTAGE
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION of nonresidential customers’ total annual electric
bills[, over the duration of the proposed OREC pricing schedule]; and
C. the price specified in the proposed OREC pricing schedule
does not exceed [$190 per megawatt–hour in 2012 dollars] AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY
THE COMMISSION; and
2. for a Round 2 offshore wind project application:
A. OVER THE DURATION OF THE PROPOSED OREC
PRICING SCHEDULE the projected incremental net rate impact for an average residential
customer, based on annual consumption of 12 megawatt–hours[,] AND combined with the
projected incremental net rate impact of other Round 2 offshore wind projects, does not

SENATE BILL 434 19
exceed [88 cents per month in 2018 dollars, over the duration of the proposed OREC pricing
schedule] AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION;
B. the projected incremental net rate impact for all
nonresidential customers, considered as a blended average[,] AND combined with the
projected net rate impact of other Round 2 offshore wind projects, does not exceed [0.9%] A
PERCENTAGE DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION of nonresidential customers’ total
annual electric bills during any year of the proposed OREC pricing schedule; and
C. the project is subject to a community benefit agreement.
(2) (i) When calculating the net benefits to the State under paragraph
(1)(ii) of this subsection, the Commission shall contract for the services of independent
consultants and experts.
(ii) When calculating the projected net average rate impacts for
Round 1 offshore wind projects under paragraph (1)(iii)1A and B of this subsection and for
Round 2 offshore wind projects under paragraph (1)(iii)2A and B of this subsection, the
Commission shall apply the same net OREC cost per megawatt–hour to residential and
nonresidential customers.
(4) THE COMMISSION SHALL KEEP ANY AMOUNTS DETERMINED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION CONFIDENTIAL.
7–704.2.
(a) (1) The Commission shall determine the offshore wind energy component
of the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard under § 7–703(b)(12) through (25) of
this subtitle based on the projected annual creation of ORECs by qualified offshore wind
projects.
(2) The Commission shall establish the [renewable] CLEAN energy
portfolio standard obligation for ORECs on a forward–looking basis that includes a surplus
to accommodate reasonable forecasting error in estimating overall electricity sales in the
State.
(3) Any positive adjustment to the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio
standard shall be on a forward–looking basis and sufficiently in advance to allow an electric
company to reflect OREC costs as a nonbypassable surcharge to distribution customers.
(4) The Commission shall adopt regulations that establish:
(i) the offshore wind purchase obligation sufficiently in advance to
allow an electric company to reflect OREC costs as a nonbypassable surcharge paid by all
distribution customers of the electric company;

SENATE BILL 434
(ii) a mechanism to adjust the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio
standard obligation in a given year to accommodate a shortfall of ORECs in one or more
earlier years that is the result of the variation between the quantity of ORECs calculated
from the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard obligation and the quantity of
ORECs approved in the Commission order for the same years; and
(iii) a nonbypassable surcharge that allows an electric company to
recover all costs associated with the purchase of ORECs from all distribution customers of
the electric company.
(b) The Commission shall adopt regulations:
(1) establishing an escrow account under Commission supervision; and
(2) defining rules that facilitate and ensure the secure and transparent
transfer of revenues and ORECs among the parties.
(c) (1) Each electric company shall purchase from the escrow account
established under this section the number of ORECs required to satisfy the offshore wind
energy component of the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard under §
7–703(b)(12) through (25) of this subtitle.
(2) (i) Subject to any escrow account reserve requirement the
Commission establishes, if there are insufficient ORECs available to satisfy the electric
companies’ OREC obligation, the overpayment shall be distributed to electric companies to
be refunded or credited to each distribution customer based on the customer’s consumption
of electricity supply that is subject to the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard.
(ii) Subject to any escrow account reserve requirement the
Commission establishes, the calculation of an electric company’s OREC purchase obligation
shall be based on final electricity sales data as reported by the PJM Interconnection as
measured at the customer meter.
(3) For each OREC for which a qualified offshore wind project receives
payment, a qualified offshore wind project shall:
(i) sell all energy, capacity, and ancillary services associated with
the creation of ORECs into the markets operated by PJM Interconnection; and
(ii) distribute the proceeds received from the sales to PJM
Interconnection markets, under item (i) of this paragraph to electric companies to be
refunded or credited to each distribution customer based on the customer’s consumption of
electricity supply that is subject to the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard.

SENATE BILL 434 21
(4) Notwithstanding § 7–709 of this subtitle, the Commission shall adopt
regulations regarding the transfer and expiration of ORECs created by a qualified offshore
wind project in excess of the OREC pricing schedule.
7–704.4.
(c) (1) The Department of General Services shall identify the amount of
energy necessary to meet the State’s energy needs.
(2) (i) The State shall use the energy procured under subsection (b) of
this section to meet the State’s energy needs and retire the associated renewable energy
credits to meet its obligations under the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard and
Chapter 38 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2022.
(ii) The State shall be exempted from the [renewable] CLEAN energy
portfolio standard requirements under § 7–703 of this subtitle if the Department of General
Services procures 100% of the State’s energy needs from the power purchase agreement
required under subsection (b) of this section.
7–705.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, each electricity
supplier shall submit a report to the Commission each year in a form and by a date specified
by the Commission that:
(i) 1. demonstrates that the electricity supplier has complied
with the applicable [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard under § 7–703 of this
subtitle and includes the submission of the required amount of renewable energy credits;
or
2. demonstrates the amount of electricity sales by which the
electricity supplier failed to meet the applicable [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio
standard;
(ii) documents the level of participation of minority business
enterprises and minorities in the activities that support the creation of renewable energy
credits used to satisfy the standard under § 7–703 of this subtitle, including development,
installation, and operation of generating facilities that create credits;
(iii) documents the amounts and types of generation associated with
renewable energy credits purchased in compliance with § 7–707(b) of this subtitle during
the reporting period; and
(iv) documents the amount of renewable energy certificates that do
not qualify as renewable energy credits as defined in § 7–701 of this subtitle, including, for
each certificate:

SENATE BILL 434
1. the energy source associated with the certificate, including
its location, when it was constructed, and which electric distribution system received the
energy;
2. whether the purchase of the certificate was bundled with
a power purchase agreement from the energy source associated with the certificate;
3. whether the certificate was purchased directly from the
operator of the energy source or through a third party; and
4. any other information required by the Commission.
(2) Paragraph (1)(iii) and (iv) of this subsection does not apply to:
(i) the Department of General Services’ sale of energy under §
7–704.4 of this subtitle; or
(ii) a community choice aggregator under § 7–510.3 of this title.
(b) (1) This subsection does not apply to a shortfall from the required Tier 1
renewable sources that is to be derived from post–2022 geothermal systems.
(2) If an electricity supplier fails to comply with the [renewable] CLEAN
energy portfolio standard for the applicable year, the electricity supplier shall pay into the
Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund established under § 9–20B–05 of the State
Government Article:
(i) except as provided in item (ii) of this paragraph, a compliance fee
of:
1. the following amounts for each kilowatt–hour of shortfall
from required Tier 1 renewable sources other than the shortfall from the required Tier 1
renewable sources that is to be derived from solar energy:
A. 4 cents through 2016;
B. 3.75 cents in 2017 and 2018;
C. 3 cents in 2019 through 2023;
D. 2.75 cents in 2024;
E. 2.5 cents in 2025;
F. 2.475 cents in 2026;
G. 2.45 cents in 2027;

SENATE BILL 434 23
H. 2.25 cents in 2028 and 2029; and
I. 2.235 cents in 2030 and later;
2. the following amounts for each kilowatt–hour of shortfall
from required Tier 1 renewable sources that is to be derived from solar energy:
A. 45 cents in 2008;
B. 40 cents in 2009 through 2014;
C. 35 cents in 2015 and 2016;
D. 19.5 cents in 2017;
E. 17.5 cents in 2018;
F. 10 cents in 2019;
G. 10 cents in 2020;
H. 8 cents in 2021;
I. 6 cents in 2022;
J. 6 cents in 2023;
K. 6 cents in 2024[;
L. 5.5 cents in 2025;
M. 4.5 cents in 2026;
N. 3.5 cents in 2027;
O. 3.25 cents in 2028;
P. 2.5 cents in 2029; and
Q. 2.25 cents in 2030] and later; and
3. 1.5 cents for each kilowatt–hour of shortfall from required
Tier 2 renewable sources; or
(ii) for industrial process load:

SENATE BILL 434
1. for each kilowatt–hour of shortfall from required Tier 1
renewable sources, a compliance fee of:
A. 0.8 cents in 2006, 2007, and 2008;
B. 0.5 cents in 2009 and 2010;
C. 0.4 cents in 2011 and 2012;
D. 0.3 cents in 2013 and 2014;
E. 0.25 cents in 2015 and 2016; and
F. except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, 0.2
cents in 2017 and later; and
2. nothing for any shortfall from required Tier 2 renewable
sources.
(3) For industrial process load, the compliance fee for each kilowatt–hour
of shortfall from required Tier 1 renewable sources is nothing for the year following any
year during which, after final calculations, the net rate impact per megawatt–hour from
Round 1 offshore wind projects exceeded $1.65 in 2012 dollars.
[(b–1)] (C) If an electricity supplier fails to comply with the [renewable] CLEAN
energy portfolio standard that is required to be derived from post–2022 geothermal systems
for the applicable year, the electricity supplier shall pay into the Maryland Strategic
Energy Investment Fund established under § 9–20B–05 of the State Government Article a
compliance fee of the following amounts for each kilowatt–hour of shortfall from required
post–2022 geothermal systems:
(1) 10 cents in 2023 through 2025;
(2) 9 cents in 2026;
(3) 8 cents in 2027; and
(4) 6.5 cents in 2028 and later.
[(c)] (D) The Commission may allow an electricity supplier to submit the report
required under § 7–505(b)(4) of this title to demonstrate compliance with the [renewable]
CLEAN energy portfolio standard.
[(d)] (E) An aggregator or broker who assists an electricity customer in
purchasing electricity but who does not supply the electricity or take title to or ownership

SENATE BILL 434 25
of the electricity may require the electricity supplier who supplies the electricity to
demonstrate compliance with this subtitle.
[(e)] (F) (1) Notwithstanding the requirements of § 7–703(b) of this subtitle,
if the actual or projected dollar–for–dollar cost incurred or to be incurred by an electricity
supplier solely for the purchase of Tier 1 renewable energy credits derived from solar energy
in any 1 year is greater than or equal to, or is anticipated to be greater than or equal to,
6.0% of the electricity supplier’s total annual electricity sales revenues in Maryland, the
electricity supplier may request that the Commission:
(i) delay by 1 year each of the scheduled percentages for solar energy
under § 7–703(b) of this subtitle that would apply to the electricity supplier; and
(ii) allow the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard for solar
energy for that year to continue to apply to the electricity supplier for the following year.
(2) In making its determination under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the
Commission shall consider the actual or projected dollar–for–dollar compliance costs of
other electricity suppliers.
(3) If an electricity supplier makes a request under paragraph (1) of this
subsection based on projected costs, the electricity supplier shall provide verifiable evidence
of the projections to the Commission at the time of the request.
(4) If the Commission allows a delay under paragraph (1) of this
subsection:
(i) the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard for solar
energy applicable to the electricity supplier under the delay continues for each subsequent
consecutive year that the actual or projected dollar–for–dollar costs incurred, or to be
incurred, by the electricity supplier solely for the purchase of solar renewable energy credits
is greater than or equal to, or is anticipated to be greater than or equal to, 6.0% of the
electricity supplier’s total annual retail electricity sales revenues in Maryland; and
(ii) the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard for solar
energy applicable to the electricity supplier under the delay is increased to the next
scheduled percentage increase under § 7–703(b) of this subtitle for each year in which the
actual or projected dollar–for–dollar costs incurred, or to be incurred, by the electricity
supplier solely for the purchase of solar renewable energy credits is less than, or is
anticipated to be less than, 6.0% of the electricity supplier’s total annual retail electricity
sales revenues in Maryland.
7–706.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, in accordance
with the obligation to provide standard offer service through the bid process created under
§ 7–510 of this title, the Commission shall allow an electricity supplier to recover actual

SENATE BILL 434
dollar–for–dollar costs incurred, including a compliance fee under § 7–705 of this subtitle,
in complying with a State–mandated [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard.
(2) In accordance with the Phase II settlement agreement approved by the
Commission in Order No. 78710 in Case No. 8908 on September 30, 2003, for any
full–service agreement executed before the [renewable] CLEAN energy PORTFOLIO
standard under this subtitle applies to an electric company, the electric company and its
wholesale electricity suppliers may pass through their commercially reasonable additional
costs, if any, associated with complying with the standard, through the end of the year of
standard offer service in which the requirement took effect.
(b) An electricity supplier may recover a compliance fee if:
(1) the payment of a compliance fee is the least–cost measure to customers
as compared to the purchase of Tier 1 renewable sources to comply with a [renewable]
CLEAN energy portfolio standard;
(2) there are insufficient Tier 1 renewable sources available for the
electricity supplier to comply with a [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard; or
(3) a wholesale electricity supplier defaults or otherwise fails to deliver
renewable energy credits under a supply contract approved by the Commission.
7–707.
(c) An electricity supplier that supplies electricity to residential retail electric
customers may not market electricity as green power unless:
(1) the percentage of the electricity being offered, or the equivalent number
of renewable energy credits associated with the electricity being marketed as green power,
that is eligible for inclusion in meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard
equals or exceeds the greater of:
(i) 51%; or
(ii) 1% higher than the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio
standard for the year the electricity is provided to the customer;
(d) (2) (i) Each year the Commission shall hold a proceeding to set a price
per megawatt–hour for electricity marketed as green power under this section that may
not be exceeded by an electricity supplier except as provided in paragraph (3) of this
subsection.
(ii) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, the price set by the
Commission under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph may:

SENATE BILL 434 27
1. exceed the maximum price per megawatt–hour that is
authorized under § 7–510(d)(2)(i) of this title; and
2. differ based on the amount and source of the electricity
generation.
(iii) During a proceeding held under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph, the Commission:
1. shall consider:
A. the price of the energy purchased, including the total cost
of the renewable energy credits;
B. the amount of electricity that is eligible for inclusion in
meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard;
C. the state in which the electricity was generated; and
D. applicable market data; and
2. may consider whether the purchase of renewable energy
credits was bundled with a power purchase agreement from the energy sources associated
with the credit.
(3) (i) On request by an electricity supplier, the Commission shall hold
a proceeding to set a price per megawatt–hour for electricity marketed as green power for
that electricity supplier.
(ii) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, at a proceeding held
under this paragraph the Commission may set a price per megawatt–hour that is higher
than the price determined in the proceeding held under paragraph (2) of this subsection for
an electricity supplier if:
1. the electricity supplier demonstrates to the Commission’s
satisfaction, based on an independent third–party audit, that the actual cost to the
electricity supplier for the generation or supply of electricity exceeds that of the price
determined through the proceeding held in accordance with paragraph (2) of this
subsection;
2. the increased price reflects only the cost of the electricity
marketed as green power and is not associated with any of the electricity supplier’s other
costs; and
3. the electricity supplier demonstrates to the Commission’s
satisfaction that the electricity supplier has a significant long–term investment in

SENATE BILL 434
renewable energy that meets the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard under §
7–703 of this subtitle.
(iii) During a proceeding held under this paragraph, the Commission
shall consider:
1. whether the purchase of renewable energy credits was
bundled with a power purchase agreement from the energy sources associated with the
credit;
2. the price of the energy purchased, including the total cost
of the renewable energy credits or power purchase agreements;
3. the amount of electricity that is eligible for inclusion in
meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard;
4. the state in which the electricity was generated; and
5. applicable market data.
(g) In addition to the disclosure required under subsection (f) of this section, the
Commission shall adopt regulations that require an electricity supplier, other than the
Department of General Services when the Department of General Services sells energy
under § 7–704.4 of this subtitle or a community choice aggregator under § 7–510.3 of this
title, that offers green power for sale to residential retail customers to include in the
electricity supplier’s marketing materials a disclosure, written in plain language, that
explains:
(4) the percentage of electricity that would be provided by the electricity
supplier that is eligible for inclusion in meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio
standard; and
7–709.
(a) An electricity supplier may use accumulated renewable energy credits to meet
the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard, including credits created by a renewable
on–site generator.
(c) (1) (i) If an electricity supplier purchases solar renewable energy
credits directly from a renewable on–site generator with a capacity that exceeds 10
kilowatts to meet the solar component of the Tier 1 [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio
standard, the duration of the contract term for the solar renewable energy credits may not
be less than 15 years.
7–709.1.
(c) (1) Under the Program, a certified system shall generate certified SRECs.

SENATE BILL 434 29
(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the provisions of
this subtitle relating to renewable energy credits shall apply to certified SRECs.
(3) A certified SREC shall have a compliance value of 150% for electricity
suppliers to put toward meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard for
energy derived from solar energy under § 7–703 of this subtitle.
(d) To be eligible for certification under the Program, a solar energy generating
system shall:
(2) be eligible for inclusion in meeting the [renewable] CLEAN energy
portfolio standard;
(i) (1) A certified system shall continue to be eligible to generate certified
SRECs for 15 years after the date of certification by the Commission, or January 1, 2025,
whichever is later, after which the system shall be eligible to generate noncertified solar
renewable energy credits as long as the system meets the requirements as a Tier 1
renewable source under this subtitle.
(2) The Commission shall:
(i) on or before January 1, 2025, begin determining eligibility of
solar energy generating systems to be certified under the Program; and
(ii) on or before July 1, 2026, implement a revised system to review
and ensure compliance with the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard.
(3) An electricity supplier may apply the certified SRECs generated in
accordance with this section toward the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio standard
starting with the 2025 compliance year.
(4) Notwithstanding any other law, the Commission shall allow electricity
suppliers to demonstrate compliance with the [renewable] CLEAN energy portfolio
standard for the 2025 compliance year by submitting information between July 1, 2026,
and December 31, 2026, using the revised system developed in accordance with paragraph
(2)(ii) of this subsection.
SUBTITLE 12. NUCLEAR ENERGY PROCUREMENT.
7–1201.
(A) AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF COMMISSION REGULATIONS
IMPLEMENTING THIS SUBTITLE, A PERSON MAY SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE
COMMISSION FOR APPROVAL OF A PROPOSED NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION
PROJECT.

SENATE BILL 434
(B) (1) ON RECEIPT OF AN APPLICATION FOR APPROVAL OF A PROPOSED
NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT, THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) OPEN AN APPLICATION PERIOD WHERE OTHER INTERESTED
PERSONS MAY SUBMIT APPLICATIONS FOR APPROVAL OF A PROPOSED NUCLEAR
ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT; AND
(II) PROVIDE NOTICE THAT THE COMMISSION IS ACCEPTING
APPLICATIONS FOR APPROVAL OF PROPOSED NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION
PROJECTS.
(2) THE COMMISSION SHALL SET THE CLOSING DATE FOR THE
APPLICATION PERIOD TO BE NOT SOONER THAN 90 DAYS AFTER THE NOTICE
PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL PROVIDE AT LEAST TWO ADDITIONAL
APPLICATION PERIODS BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2031.
(D) THE COMMISSION MAY PROVIDE ADDITIONAL APPLICATION PERIODS
THAT MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
7–1202.
UNLESS EXTENDED BY MUTUAL CONSENT OF THE PARTIES, THE COMMISSION
SHALL APPROVE, CONDITIONALLY APPROVE, OR DENY AN APPLICATION WITHIN 1
YEAR AFTER THE CLOSE OF THE APPLICATION PERIOD.
7–1203.
AN APPLICATION SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) A DETAILED DESCRIPTION AND FINANCIAL ANALYSIS OF THE
PROPOSED NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT;
(2) THE PROPOSED METHOD OF FINANCING THE PROJECT,
INCLUDING DOCUMENTATION DEMONSTRATING THAT THE APPLICANT HAS APPLIED
FOR ALL CURRENT ELIGIBLE STATE AND FEDERAL GRANTS, REBATES, TAX CREDITS,
LOAN GUARANTEES, AND OTHER PROGRAMS AVAILABLE TO OFFSET THE COST OF
THE PROJECT OR PROVIDE TAX ADVANTAGES;
(3) A COMMITMENT THAT THE APPLICANT WILL USE BEST EFFORTS
TO APPLY FOR ALL ELIGIBLE STATE AND FEDERAL GRANTS, REBATES, TAX CREDITS,

SENATE BILL 434 31
LOAN GUARANTEES, OR OTHER SIMILAR BENEFITS AS THOSE BENEFITS BECOME
AVAILABLE;
(4) A COST–BENEFIT ANALYSIS THAT SHALL INCLUDE AT A MINIMUM:
(I) A DETAILED INPUT–OUTPUT ANALYSIS OF THE IMPACT OF
THE PROJECT ON INCOME, EMPLOYMENT, WAGES, AND TAXES IN THE STATE;
(II) DETAILED INFORMATION CONCERNING ASSUMED
EMPLOYMENT IMPACTS IN THE STATE, INCLUDING THE EXPECTED DURATION OF
EMPLOYMENT OPPORTUNITIES, THE SALARY OF EACH POSITION, AND OTHER
SUPPORTING EVIDENCE OF EMPLOYMENT IMPACTS;
(III) AN ANALYSIS OF THE ANTICIPATED ENVIRONMENTAL
BENEFITS, HEALTH BENEFITS, AND ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACTS OF THE PROJECT TO
THE CITIZENS OF THE STATE;
(IV) AN ANALYSIS OF ANY IMPACT ON RESIDENTIAL,
COMMERCIAL, AND INDUSTRIAL RATEPAYERS OVER THE LIFE OF THE PROJECT;
(V) AN ANALYSIS OF ANY LONG–TERM EFFECT ON ENERGY AND
CAPACITY MARKETS AS A RESULT OF THE PROJECT;
(VI) AN ANALYSIS OF ANY IMPACT ON BUSINESSES IN THE STATE;
AND
(VII) OTHER BENEFITS RESULTING FROM THE PROJECT, SUCH AS
INCREASED IN–STATE CONSTRUCTION, OPERATION AND MAINTENANCE NEEDS, AND
EQUIPMENT PURCHASES;
(5) A PROPOSED LONG–TERM PRICING SCHEDULE FOR THE PROJECT
THAT SHALL SPECIFY A PRICE FOR THE GENERATION ATTRIBUTES, INCLUDING THE
ENERGY, CAPACITY, ANCILLARY SERVICES, AND ENVIRONMENTAL ATTRIBUTES;
(6) A DECOMMISSIONING AND WASTE STORAGE PLAN FOR THE
PROJECT, INCLUDING PROVISIONS FOR DECOMMISSIONING OR WASTE STORAGE AS
REQUIRED BY THE U.S. NUCLEAR REGULATORY COMMISSION;
(7) A COMMITMENT TO:
(I) ABIDE BY THE REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN § 7–1206 OF
THIS SUBTITLE; AND

SENATE BILL 434
(II) DEPOSIT AT LEAST $6,000,000 INTO THE MARYLAND CLEAN
ENERGY BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–20C–03 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE;
(8) A DESCRIPTION OF THE APPLICANT’S PLAN FOR ENGAGING SMALL
BUSINESSES, AS DEFINED IN § 14–501 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT
ARTICLE;
(9) IF APPLICABLE, THE STATEMENT SPECIFIED IN § 7–1204(C)(2) OF
THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(10) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE COMMISSION REQUIRES.
7–1204.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL USE THE FOLLOWING CRITERIA TO EVALUATE
AND COMPARE PROPOSED NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECTS SUBMITTED
DURING AN APPLICATION PERIOD:
(1) THE LOWEST COST IMPACT ON RATEPAYERS OF THE PRICE SET
UNDER A PROPOSED PRICING SCHEDULE;
(2) POTENTIAL REDUCTIONS IN TRANSMISSION CONGESTION PRICES
WITHIN THE STATE;
(3) POTENTIAL CHANGES IN CAPACITY PRICES WITHIN THE STATE;
(4) POTENTIAL REDUCTIONS IN LOCATIONAL MARGINAL PRICING;
(5) POTENTIAL LONG–TERM CHANGES IN CAPACITY PRICES WITHIN
THE STATE FROM THE PROJECT AS IT COMPARES TO CONVENTIONAL ENERGY
SOURCES;
(6) THE EXTENT TO WHICH THE COST–BENEFIT ANALYSIS SUBMITTED
UNDER § 7–1203 OF THIS SUBTITLE DEMONSTRATES POSITIVE NET ECONOMIC,
ENVIRONMENTAL, AND HEALTH BENEFITS TO THE STATE;
(7) THE EXTENT TO WHICH AN APPLICANT’S PLAN FOR ENGAGING
SMALL BUSINESSES MEETS THE GOALS SPECIFIED IN TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 5 OF THE
STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE;
(8) THE EXTENT TO WHICH AN APPLICANT’S PLAN PROVIDES FOR THE
USE OF SKILLED LABOR, PARTICULARLY WITH REGARD TO THE CONSTRUCTION AND

SENATE BILL 434 33
MANUFACTURING COMPONENTS OF THE PROJECT, THROUGH OUTREACH, HIRING,
OR REFERRAL SYSTEMS THAT ARE AFFILIATED WITH REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP
PROGRAMS UNDER TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 4 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT
ARTICLE;
(9) THE EXTENT TO WHICH AN APPLICANT’S PLAN PROVIDES FOR THE
USE OF AN AGREEMENT DESIGNED TO ENSURE THE USE OF SKILLED LABOR AND TO
PROMOTE THE PROMPT, EFFICIENT, AND SAFE COMPLETION OF THE PROJECT,
PARTICULARLY WITH REGARD TO THE CONSTRUCTION, MANUFACTURING, AND
MAINTENANCE OF THE PROJECT;
(10) THE EXTENT TO WHICH AN APPLICANT’S PLAN PROVIDES FOR
COMPENSATION TO ITS EMPLOYEES AND SUBCONTRACTORS CONSISTENT WITH
WAGES OUTLINED UNDER §§ 17–201 THROUGH 17–227 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE;
(11) SITING AND PROJECT FEASIBILITY;
(12) THE EXTENT TO WHICH THE PROJECT WOULD REQUIRE
TRANSMISSION OR DISTRIBUTION INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS IN THE
STATE;
(13) THE ESTIMATED ABILITY OF THE PROJECT TO ASSIST IN MEETING
THE CLEAN ELECTRICITY GOAL UNDER § 7–702 OF THIS TITLE; AND
(14) ANY OTHER CRITERIA THAT THE COMMISSION DETERMINES ARE
APPROPRIATE.
(B) IN EVALUATING AND COMPARING AN APPLICANT’S PROPOSED NUCLEAR
ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION MAY CONTRACT FOR THE SERVICES OF INDEPENDENT CONSULTANTS
AND EXPERTS.
(C) (1) IN THIS PARAGRAPH, “MINORITY” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
A MEMBER OF ANY OF THE GROUPS LISTED IN § 14–301(K)(1)(I) OF THE STATE
FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) IF AN APPLICANT IS SEEKING INVESTORS IN A PROPOSED
NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT, THE APPLICANT SHALL TAKE THE
FOLLOWING STEPS BEFORE THE COMMISSION MAY APPROVE THE PROPOSED
PROJECT TO:

SENATE BILL 434
(I) MAKE SERIOUS, GOOD–FAITH EFFORTS TO SOLICIT AND
INTERVIEW A REASONABLE NUMBER OF MINORITY INVESTORS;
(II) AS PART OF THE APPLICATION, SUBMIT A STATEMENT TO
THE COMMISSION THAT LISTS THE NAMES AND ADDRESSES OF ALL MINORITY
INVESTORS INTERVIEWED AND WHETHER OR NOT ANY OF THOSE INVESTORS HAVE
PURCHASED AN EQUITY SHARE IN THE ENTITY SUBMITTING THE APPLICATION;
(III) SIGN A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING WITH THE
COMMISSION THAT REQUIRES THE APPLICANT TO AGAIN MAKE SERIOUS,
GOOD–FAITH EFFORTS TO SOLICIT AND INTERVIEW A REASONABLE NUMBER OF
MINORITY INVESTORS IN ANY FUTURE ATTEMPTS TO RAISE VENTURE CAPITAL OR
ATTRACT NEW INVESTORS TO THE PROJECT;
(IV) SIGN A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING WITH THE
COMMISSION THAT REQUIRES THE APPLICANT TO USE BEST EFFORTS AND
EFFECTIVE OUTREACH TO OBTAIN, AS A GOAL, CONTRACTORS AND
SUBCONTRACTORS FOR THE PROJECT THAT ARE MINORITY BUSINESS
ENTERPRISES, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, AS SUPPORTED BY A DISPARITY
STUDY; AND
(V) SIGN A MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING WITH THE
COMMISSION AND SKILLED LABOR ORGANIZATIONS THAT REQUIRES THE
APPLICANT TO FOLLOW THE PORTIONS OF THE APPLICANT’S PLAN THAT RELATE TO
THE CRITERIA SET FORTH IN SUBSECTION (A)(8) AND (9) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF SMALL, MINORITY, AND WOMEN
BUSINESS AFFAIRS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL, SHALL PROVIDE ASSISTANCE TO ALL POTENTIAL APPLICANTS AND
POTENTIAL MINORITY INVESTORS TO SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2)(I) AND (III) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
7–1205.
(A) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT APPROVE AN APPLICANT’S PROPOSED
NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT UNLESS:
(1) THE PROJECT IS CONNECTED TO THE ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION
SYSTEM SERVING THE STATE;
(2) OVER THE DURATION OF THE PROPOSED LONG–TERM PRICING
SCHEDULE, THE PROJECTED NET RATE IMPACT FOR AN AVERAGE RESIDENTIAL
CUSTOMER, BASED ON ANNUAL CONSUMPTION OF 12,000 KILOWATT–HOURS AND

SENATE BILL 434 35
COMBINED WITH THE PROJECTED NET RATE IMPACT OF OTHER NUCLEAR ENERGY
GENERATION PROJECTS, DOES NOT EXCEED AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE
COMMISSION;
(3) OVER THE DURATION OF THE PROPOSED LONG–TERM PRICING
SCHEDULE, THE PROJECTED NET RATE IMPACT FOR ALL NONRESIDENTIAL
CUSTOMERS, CONSIDERED AS A BLENDED AVERAGE AND COMBINED WITH THE
PROJECTED NET RATE IMPACT OF OTHER NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION
PROJECTS, DOES NOT EXCEED A PERCENTAGE DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION
OF NONRESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS’ TOTAL ANNUAL ELECTRIC BILLS; AND
(4) THE PRICE SPECIFIED IN THE PROPOSED LONG–TERM PRICING
SCHEDULE DOES NOT EXCEED AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION.
(B) WHEN CALCULATING THE PROJECTED NET AVERAGE RATE IMPACTS
FOR NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECTS UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
COMMISSION SHALL APPLY THE SAME NET LONG–TERM COST PER
MEGAWATT–HOUR TO RESIDENTIAL AND NONRESIDENTIAL CUSTOMERS.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL KEEP CONFIDENTIAL ANY AMOUNTS
DETERMINED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
7–1206.
(A) AN APPLICATION FOR A PROPOSED NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION
PROJECT IS SUBJECT TO A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT.
(B) A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT SHALL:
(1) BE APPLICABLE TO THE DEVELOPMENT OF A NUCLEAR ENERGY
GENERATION PROJECT;
(2) PROMOTE INCREASED OPPORTUNITIES FOR LOCAL BUSINESSES
AND SMALL, MINORITY, WOMEN–OWNED, AND VETERAN–OWNED BUSINESSES IN THE
CLEAN ENERGY INDUSTRY;
(3) ENSURE THE TIMELY, SAFE, AND EFFICIENT COMPLETION OF THE
PROJECT BY:
(I) FACILITATING A STEADY SUPPLY OF HIGHLY SKILLED
CRAFT WORKERS WHO SHALL BE PAID NOT LESS THAN THE PREVAILING WAGE RATE
DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSIONER OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY UNDER TITLE 17,
SUBTITLE 2 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE; AND

SENATE BILL 434
(II) GUARANTEEING THAT THE CONSTRUCTION WORK
PERFORMED IN CONNECTION WITH THE PROJECT WILL BE SUBJECT TO AN
AGREEMENT THAT:
1. IS WITH ONE OR MORE LABOR ORGANIZATIONS; AND
2. ESTABLISHES, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION,
THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF EMPLOYMENT AT THE CONSTRUCTION SITE OF THE
PROJECT OR A PORTION OF THE PROJECT;
(4) PROMOTE SAFE COMPLETION OF THE PROJECT BY ENSURING
THAT AT LEAST 80% OF THE CRAFT WORKERS ON THE PROJECT HAVE COMPLETED
AN OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH ADMINISTRATION 10–HOUR OR 30–HOUR
COURSE;
(5) PROMOTE CAREER TRAINING OPPORTUNITIES IN THE
MANUFACTURING, MAINTENANCE, AND CONSTRUCTION INDUSTRIES FOR LOCAL
RESIDENTS, VETERANS, WOMEN, AND MINORITIES;
(6) PROVIDE FOR BEST EFFORTS AND EFFECTIVE OUTREACH TO
OBTAIN, AS A GOAL, THE USE OF A WORKFORCE INCLUDING MINORITIES, TO THE
EXTENT PRACTICABLE;
(7) REFLECT A 21ST–CENTURY LABOR–MANAGEMENT APPROACH BY
DEVELOPERS AND SUPPLIERS BASED ON COOPERATION, HARMONY, AND
PARTNERSHIP THAT PROACTIVELY SEEKS TO ENSURE THAT WORKERS CAN FREELY
CHOOSE TO BOTH ORGANIZE AND COLLECTIVELY BARGAIN;
(8) PROVIDE PLANS TO USE DOMESTIC IRON, STEEL, AND
MANUFACTURED GOODS TO THE GREATEST EXTENT PRACTICABLE BY DISCLOSING
CONTRACTED SUPPLIERS;
(9) USE LOCALLY AND DOMESTICALLY MANUFACTURED
CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS AND COMPONENTS;
(10) MAXIMIZE THE USE OF SKILLED LOCAL LABOR, PARTICULARLY
WITH REGARD TO THE CONSTRUCTION AND MANUFACTURING COMPONENTS OF THE
PROJECT, USING METHODS INCLUDING OUTREACH, HIRING, OR REFERRAL
METHODS THAT ARE AFFILIATED WITH REGISTERED APPRENTICESHIP PROGRAMS
UNDER TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 4 OF THE LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT ARTICLE;

SENATE BILL 434 37
(11) GUARANTEE AGAINST STRIKES, LOCKOUTS, AND SIMILAR
DISRUPTIONS;
(12) ENSURE THAT ALL WORK ON THE PROJECT FULLY CONFORMS TO
ALL RELEVANT STATE AND FEDERAL LAWS, RULES, AND REGULATIONS;
(13) CREATE MUTUALLY BINDING PROCEDURES FOR RESOLVING
LABOR DISPUTES ARISING DURING THE TERM OF THE PROJECT;
(14) SET FORTH OTHER MECHANISMS FOR LABOR–MANAGEMENT
COOPERATION ON MATTERS OF MUTUAL INTEREST AND CONCERN, INCLUDING
PRODUCTIVITY, QUALITY OF WORK, SAFETY, AND HEALTH; AND
(15) BIND ALL CONTRACTORS AND SUBCONTRACTORS TO THE TERMS
OF THE AGREEMENT THROUGH THE INCLUSION OF APPROPRIATE PROVISIONS IN
ALL RELEVANT SOLICITATION AND CONTRACT DOCUMENTS.
7–1207.
(A) AN ORDER THE COMMISSION ISSUES APPROVING A PROPOSED
NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT SHALL:
(1) SPECIFY THE LONG–TERM PRICING SCHEDULE;
(2) SPECIFY THE DURATION OF THE LONG–TERM PRICING SCHEDULE,
NOT TO EXCEED 30 YEARS;
(3) PROVIDE THAT:
(I) A PAYMENT MAY NOT BE MADE UNDER A LONG–TERM
PRICING SCHEDULE UNTIL ELECTRICITY SUPPLY IS GENERATED BY THE PROJECT;
AND
(II) RATEPAYERS AND THE STATE SHALL BE HELD HARMLESS
FOR ANY COST OVERRUNS ASSOCIATED WITH THE PROJECT; AND
(4) REQUIRE THAT ANY DEBT INSTRUMENT ISSUED IN CONNECTION
WITH THE PROJECT INCLUDE LANGUAGE SPECIFYING THAT THE DEBT INSTRUMENT
DOES NOT ESTABLISH A DEBT, OBLIGATION, OR LIABILITY OF THE STATE.
(B) AN ORDER APPROVING A PROPOSED NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION
PROJECT VESTS THE OWNER OF THE PROJECT WITH THE RIGHT TO RECEIVE
PAYMENTS ACCORDING TO THE TERMS IN THE ORDER.

SENATE BILL 434
(C) ON OR BEFORE MARCH 1 EACH YEAR, THE COMMISSION SHALL REPORT
TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, TO THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION, ENERGY,
AND THE ENVIRONMENT AND THE HOUSE ECONOMIC MATTERS COMMITTEE ON:
(1) APPLICANT COMPLIANCE WITH THE MINORITY BUSINESS
ENTERPRISE PARTICIPATION GOALS UNDER § 7–1204(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) WITH RESPECT TO THE COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT UNDER
§ 7–1206 OF THIS SUBTITLE:
(I) THE AVAILABILITY AND USE OF OPPORTUNITIES FOR LOCAL
BUSINESSES AND SMALL, MINORITY, WOMEN–OWNED, AND VETERAN–OWNED
BUSINESSES;
(II) THE SUCCESS OF EFFORTS TO PROMOTE CAREER TRAINING
OPPORTUNITIES IN THE MANUFACTURING, MAINTENANCE, AND CONSTRUCTION
INDUSTRIES FOR LOCAL RESIDENTS, VETERANS, WOMEN, AND MINORITIES; AND
(III) COMPLIANCE WITH THE MINORITY WORKFORCE GOAL
UNDER § 7–1206(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
7–1208.
(A) (1) IF THE COMMISSION APPROVES PROPOSALS THAT
DEMONSTRATE, BASED ON THE CRITERIA SPECIFIED IN § 7–1203 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
POSITIVE NET ECONOMIC, ENVIRONMENTAL, AND HEALTH BENEFITS TO THE STATE,
THE COMMISSION SHALL APPROVE ORDERS TO FACILITATE THE FINANCING OF
NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECTS.
(2) WHEN CALCULATING THE NET BENEFITS TO THE STATE UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COMMISSION MAY CONTRACT FOR THE
SERVICES OF INDEPENDENT CONSULTANTS AND EXPERTS.
(B) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT APPROVE AN ORDER TO FACILITATE THE
FINANCING OF A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT UNLESS THE PROJECT IS
SUBJECT TO A COMMUNITY BENEFIT AGREEMENT UNDER § 7–1206 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
7–1209.

SENATE BILL 434 39
(A) THE FINDINGS AND EVIDENCE RELIED ON BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
FOR THE CONTINUATION OF THE MINORITY BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PROGRAM
UNDER TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT
ARTICLE ARE INCORPORATED IN THIS SECTION.
(B) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE AND AUTHORIZED BY THE UNITED
STATES CONSTITUTION, APPROVED APPLICANTS FOR A PROPOSED NUCLEAR
ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT SHALL COMPLY WITH THE STATE’S MINORITY
BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PROGRAM.
(C) (1) WITHIN 6 MONTHS AFTER THE ISSUANCE OF AN ORDER THAT
APPROVES A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT AND INCLUDES A
LONG–TERM PRICING COMPONENT, THE GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF SMALL,
MINORITY, AND WOMEN BUSINESS AFFAIRS, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE
OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL AND THE APPROVED APPLICANT, SHALL ESTABLISH A
CLEAR PLAN FOR SETTING REASONABLE AND APPROPRIATE MINORITY BUSINESS
ENTERPRISE PARTICIPATION GOALS AND PROCEDURES FOR EACH PHASE OF THE
NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT.
(2) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE GOALS AND PROCEDURES SET
IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE BASED ON
THE REQUIREMENTS OF TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE AND THE REGULATIONS IMPLEMENTING THAT SUBTITLE.
(3) EVERY 6 MONTHS FOLLOWING THE ISSUANCE OF AN ORDER THAT
APPROVES A NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT AND INCLUDES A
LONG–TERM PRICING COMPONENT, AN APPROVED APPLICANT SHALL SUBMIT A
REPORT ON ITS PROGRESS ESTABLISHING AND IMPLEMENTING MINORITY BUSINESS
ENTERPRISE GOALS AND PROCEDURES TO THE COMMISSION.
7–1210.
(A) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT:
(1) ESTABLISH THE NUCLEAR ENERGY LONG–TERM PRICING
PURCHASE OBLIGATION SUFFICIENTLY IN ADVANCE TO ALLOW AN ELECTRIC
COMPANY TO REFLECT NUCLEAR ENERGY LONG–TERM PRICING COSTS AS A
NONBYPASSABLE SURCHARGE PAID BY ALL DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMERS OF THE
ELECTRIC COMPANY;
(2) ESTABLISH A NONBYPASSABLE SURCHARGE THAT ALLOWS AN
ELECTRIC COMPANY TO RECOVER ALL COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE PURCHASE OF

SENATE BILL 434
NUCLEAR ENERGY FROM ALL DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMERS OF THE ELECTRIC
COMPANY;
(3) ESTABLISH AN ESCROW ACCOUNT THAT IS UNDER COMMISSION
SUPERVISION; AND
(4) DEFINE RULES THAT FACILITATE AND ENSURE THE SECURE AND
TRANSPARENT TRANSFER OF REVENUES AND LONG–TERM PRICING PAYMENTS
AMONG PARTIES.
(B) (1) EACH ELECTRIC COMPANY SHALL PROCURE FROM THE ESCROW
ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED BY REGULATION UNDER THIS SECTION A VOLUME OF
NUCLEAR ENERGY EQUAL TO THE ELECTRIC COMPANY’S RESPECTIVE PERCENTAGE
OF RETAIL ELECTRIC SALES EACH YEAR.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO ANY ESCROW ACCOUNT RESERVE
REQUIREMENT THE COMMISSION ESTABLISHES, IF THERE IS INSUFFICIENT
NUCLEAR ENERGY AVAILABLE TO SATISFY THE ELECTRIC COMPANIES’ NUCLEAR
ENERGY OBLIGATION, THE OVERPAYMENT SHALL BE DISTRIBUTED TO ELECTRIC
COMPANIES TO BE REFUNDED OR CREDITED TO EACH DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMER
BASED ON THE CUSTOMER’S CONSUMPTION OF ELECTRICITY SUPPLY THAT IS
SUBJECT TO THE CLEAN ENERGY PORTFOLIO STANDARD.
(II) SUBJECT TO ANY ESCROW ACCOUNT RESERVE
REQUIREMENT THE COMMISSION ESTABLISHES, THE CALCULATION OF AN
ELECTRIC COMPANY’S NUCLEAR ENERGY PURCHASE OBLIGATION SHALL BE BASED
ON FINAL ELECTRICITY SALES DATA AS REPORTED BY PJM INTERCONNECTION AND
MEASURED AT THE CUSTOMER METER.
(3) FOR EACH LONG–TERM PRICING SCHEDULE FOR WHICH A
NUCLEAR ENERGY GENERATION PROJECT RECEIVES PAYMENT, THE PROJECT
SHALL:
(I) SELL ALL ENERGY, CAPACITY, AND ANCILLARY SERVICES
ASSOCIATED WITH THE CREATION OF THE LONG–TERM PRICING INTO THE MARKETS
OPERATED BY PJM INTERCONNECTION; AND
(II) DISTRIBUTE THE PROCEEDS RECEIVED FROM THE SALES
UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH TO ELECTRIC COMPANIES TO BE REFUNDED
OR CREDITED TO EACH DISTRIBUTION CUSTOMER BASED ON THE CUSTOMER’S
CONSUMPTION OF ELECTRICITY SUPPLY THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE CLEAN ENERGY
PORTFOLIO STANDARD.

SENATE BILL 434 41
(C) A DEBT, OBLIGATION, OR LIABILITY OF A NUCLEAR ENERGY
GENERATION PROJECT OR OF AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF A NUCLEAR ENERGY
GENERATION PROJECT MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED A DEBT, OBLIGATION, OR
LIABILITY OF THE STATE.
7–1211.
ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, THE COMMISSION SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS
TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBTITLE.
Article – State Government
9–20C–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Administration” means the Maryland Energy Administration.
(c) “Advisory Committee” means the Maryland [Offshore Wind] CLEAN
ENERGY Business Development Advisory Committee established under § 9–20C–02 of this
subtitle.
(d) “Director” means the Director of the Maryland Energy Administration.
(e) “Emerging business” means a business that is at least 51% owned and
controlled by an individual or individuals who are certified to have a personal net worth,
as defined in § 14–301 of the State Finance and Procurement Article, that does not exceed
$6,500,000 as adjusted each year for inflation according to the Consumer Price Index.
(f) “Fund” means the Maryland [Offshore Wind] CLEAN ENERGY Business
Development Fund established under § 9–20C–03 of this subtitle.
(g) “Minority” means an individual who is a member of any of the groups listed in
§ 14–301(k)(1)(i) of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
9–20C–02.
(a) There is a Maryland [Offshore Wind] CLEAN ENERGY Business
Development Advisory Committee.
(b) The Advisory Committee shall make recommendations to the Administration
on the most effective manner to use money in the Fund consistent with the purposes of the
Fund.
(c) The Advisory Committee consists of the following members:

SENATE BILL 434
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, one from each of the principal
political parties, appointed by the President of the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, one from each of the principal
political parties, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(3) the Director or the Director’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of Commerce, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the Special Secretary of the Governor’s Office of Small, Minority, and
Women Business Affairs, or the Special Secretary’s designee; and
(6) the following [12] members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) [1] ONE representative of a public institution of higher education
in the State;
(ii) [1] ONE representative of a historically black or African
American university in the State;
(iii) [1] ONE representative of the State’s community colleges;
(iv) [1] ONE representative of the Maryland Independent Colleges
and Universities Association;
(v) [1] ONE representative of the Maryland Small Business
Development Center Network;
(vi) [1] ONE representative of the Maryland Business Coalition for
Offshore Wind;
(vii) [1] ONE representative of a business incubator in the State with
experience in providing services to minority business enterprises as defined in § 14–301 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article, or to emerging businesses, including emerging
businesses owned by minorities;
(viii) [1] ONE individual with experience in providing business
financing to minority business enterprises as defined in § 14–301 of the State Finance and
Procurement Article, or to emerging businesses, including emerging businesses owned by
minorities;
(ix) [1] ONE representative of an offshore wind developer;
(x) [1] ONE representative of an original equipment manufacturer;

SENATE BILL 434 43
(xi) [1] ONE individual who is a minority business advocate; [and]
(XII) TWO REPRESENTATIVES OF THE NUCLEAR ENERGY
INDUSTRY;
(XIII) TWO REPRESENTATIVES OF THE SOLAR ENERGY INDUSTRY;
(XIV) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE ENERGY STORAGE
INDUSTRY; AND
[(xii)] (XV) [1] ONE individual with experience in [offshore wind]
supply chain issues.
(d) The Governor shall appoint the chair of the Advisory Committee.
(e) The Administration shall provide staff for the Advisory Committee.
(f) A member of the Advisory Committee:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Advisory Committee;
but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(g) (1) On or before December 31, [2013] 2026, the Advisory Committee shall
provide written recommendations to the Administration regarding the most effective use
of money in the Fund in order to maximize opportunities for emerging businesses in the
State, including minority–owned emerging businesses, to participate in [the offshore wind
industry] CLEAN ENERGY INDUSTRIES.
(2) In making a recommendation under paragraph (1) of this subsection,
the Advisory Committee shall consider opportunities to maximize leveraging opportunities,
mentoring and protege models, innovation clusters, existing incubator and business
development programs, and the appropriate role of partnerships with the State’s
universities and community colleges.
[(3) On or before December 31, 2014, the Advisory Committee shall provide
updated recommendations to the Administration.]
(h) On completion and submission of the written recommendations required
under subsection (g) of this section, the Advisory Committee shall terminate its operation
and cease to meet.
9–20C–03.

SENATE BILL 434
(a) There is a Maryland [Offshore Wind] CLEAN ENERGY Business
Development Fund in the Administration.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the publisher of the
Annotated Code of Maryland, in consultation with and subject to the approval of the
Department of Legislative Services, shall correct, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, cross–references and terminology rendered incorrect by this Act. The
publisher shall adequately describe any correction that is made in an editor’s note following
the section affected.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That a presently existing obligation
or contract right may not be impaired in any way by this Act.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That for fiscal year 2026, funds
from the Dedicated Purpose Account may be transferred by budget amendment, in
accordance with § 7–310 of the State Finance and Procurement Article, to implement the
requirements of §§ 7–1201, 7–1204, and 7–1211 of the Public Utilities Article, as enacted
by Section 1 of this Act.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply retroactively and shall be applied to and interpreted to affect all clean energy
portfolio standard compliance years that begin on or after January 1, 2025.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.